Utah statutes.
17-2-208.   Pending criminal proceedings.

All criminal proceedings and actions pending in the annexed territory at the time of annexation shall be prosecuted to judgment and execution in the annexed territory as part of the annexing county.  All offenses committed in the annexed territory before annexation that have not been prosecuted may be prosecuted to judgment and execution in the annexed territory or any part of the annexing county.

